Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-36] Appeal. An interested party
aggrieved by any order or decree of the court under this chapter may appeal as
provided in section 571-54. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

See Rules Expediting Child Protective Appeals.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next